Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5261.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 322. (1) The department shall enter into an interagency agreement in cooperation with the agency to do all of the following: (a) Conduct statewide outreach on mental health and substance use disorder support resources for service members, veterans, and the families of service members and veterans. (b) Develop resources and materials to help families identify changes in a service member's or veteran's mental health, including substance use disorders. (c) Collect the information described in section 5 of the protecting veterans mental health act. (2) The department shall create and operate a program that provides resources and support for the families of service members and veterans on navigating mental health and substance use disorders for service members, veterans, and individuals affected by those mental health and substance use disorders. (3) The agency may utilize an electronic or mobile platform to connect veterans, service members, and the families of service members and veterans to available services and resources under the interagency agreement created under this section. (4) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the agency or the department in the performance of an official function under this section and that contains information specific to an individual service member or veteran is not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Agency" means the Michigan veterans affairs agency. (b) "Department" means the department of health and human services. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5270 (request no. H00608'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.